Maine, session 132, LD847.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4581-A, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 366, §10 and
c. 476, §3, is further amended to read:
B. Discriminate in the granting of financial assistance, or in the terms, conditions or
privileges relating to obtaining or the use of any financial assistance, against any
applicant because of race or color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical
or mental disability, religion, ancestry, national origin, familial status or any previous
actions seeking and receiving an order of protection under Title 19‑A, section 4007; or
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4581-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 613, §11 and affected
by §29, is amended to read:
4. Receipt of public assistance. For any person furnishing rental premises or public
accommodations to refuse to rent or impose different terms of tenancy to any individual
who is a recipient of federal, state or local public assistance, including medical assistance
and housing subsidies, primarily because of the individual's status as recipient.;
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §4581-A, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Discrimination based on source of income. Beginning January 1, 2026, for any
owner, lessee, sublessee, managing agent or other person having the right to sell or rent or
manage a housing accommodation, or any agent of these, to refuse to rent or negotiate for
the rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a housing accommodation to any
person because of the source of the person's money or other income as long as the money
or other income is lawfully obtained and is verifiable as paid to the person, to another
person on the person's behalf or to a representative of the person such as a representative
payee appointed by the United States Social Security Administration. Examples of
lawfully obtained money or other income include, but are not limited to:
A. Money or other income from a federal, state or local public assistance program,
such as rental vouchers or rental assistance, paid directly to the person, to a family
member of the person or to a landlord on behalf of the person;
B. Money or other income from a nongovernmental organization paid directly to the
person, to a family member of the person or to a landlord on behalf of the person; or
C. Benefits received from the United States Social Security Administration or United
States Railroad Retirement Board.
This subsection does not apply to an owner of fewer than 4 residential dwelling units held
for rental purposes.
In addition to any civil remedies available under this chapter, a person aggrieved by a
violation of this subsection may bring an action under section 213. In addition to the relief
available under section 213, a person aggrieved by a violation of this subsection is entitled
to a monetary penalty of $1,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater; or
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §4581-A, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Discrimination based on financial assessment disregarding amount of housing
subsidy. Beginning January 1, 2026, for any owner, lessee, sublessee, managing agent or
other person having the right to sell or rent or manage a housing accommodation, or any
agent of these, to assess a person's financial ability to pay the entire rental amount when a
Page 1 - 132LR0754(01)

413 portion of the rental amount is subsidized through federal, state or local housing assistance.
424 The financial assessment may apply only to the portion of the rental amount not subsidized
435 through housing assistance.
In addition to any civil remedies available under this chapter, a person aggrieved by a
violation of this subsection may bring an action under section 213. In addition to the relief
available under section 213, a person aggrieved by a violation of this subsection is entitled
to a monetary penalty of $1,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater.
Sec. 5. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.